Utah statutes.
17-50-104.   Counties of the state -- County boundaries maintained by lieutenant governor.

(1)  The counties of the state are those whose geographic boundaries are described in the official county boundary records maintained by the office of the lieutenant governor and may be changed only in accordance with the provisions of this title.

(2)  The office of the lieutenant governor shall maintain the official county boundaries for the counties of the state and update those boundaries upon the lieutenant governor's issuance, under Section 67-1a-6.5, of an applicable certificate, as defined in that section.

